Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 619.042 is amended to read:
619.042. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Amenable species” has the meaning given that term in 21 U.S.C. 601(w).
(b) “Equines” means members of the family Equidae.
(c) “Nonamenable species” has the meaning given that term by the  State Department of Agri-
culture by rule.
(d) “Processing” means activities that are subject to regulation under  ORS 619.010 to 619.071
or ORS chapter 603.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 603.015 and 619.021, the department  may adopt rules to establish a
program of state inspection for the processing and sale of :
(a) Meat products from amenable species, including but not limited to cattle and sheep[ .]; and
(b) Poultry.
(3) The department may administer or enforce  rules adopted under subsection (2) of this section
for a program  of state inspection for the processing and sale of meat products from amenable species
and of poultry only if the department has full federal approval for the program.
(4) The department may adopt rules to establish  a program of state inspection for the processing
and sale of meat products from nonamenable species.
(5) Rules adopted under this section  must impose requirements that are at least equal to the
requirements imposed under  the Federal Meat Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. 601 to 695) , the Poultry
Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. 451 to 472)  and the federal  Humane Methods of Livestock
Slaughter Act (7 U.S.C. 1901 to 1907).
(6) Under the programs of state inspection described in subsections  (2) and (4) of this section,
except as provided in subsections (3) and (7) of this section, the department:
(a) Shall inspect the meat  and poultry products.
(b) Under ORS 619.031, may license establishments operating under either program of state in-
spection.
(c) Under  ORS 619.031 (2) and (3), may establish license requirements and license fee schedules
for establishments operating under either program of state inspection.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (6) of this  section, the department may not establish, ad-
minister or enforce a program of inspection for the processing or sale of meat products from equines.
Enrolled Senate Bill 809 (SB 809-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 2.  ORS 616.910 is amended to read:
616.910. The State Department of Agriculture shall  adopt rules allowing donations to charitable
organizations, including low-income nutritional centers, and to  other organizations that offer food
for noncommercial purposes, of meat that is:
(1) Processed by a person licensed by the department under ORS chapter  603 to slaughter meat
animals and subject to federal meat inspection.
(2) Processed under a federally approved program of state inspection for  the processing and sale
of meat products from amenable species  and of poultry , as described in ORS 619.042.
(3) Processed at  a custom processing establishment, or slaughtered at a custom slaughtering
establishment, pursuant to ORS 619.010 to 619.026 and 619.036 to 619.066.
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 809 (SB 809-INTRO) Page 2